dev/ortho/lat-cyr.twol
Alphabet

 !ء
 !ئ ا ە ب پ ت ج چ خ د ر ز ژ س ش غ ف ق ك گ ڭ ل م ن ھ و ۇ ۆ ۋ ې ى ي  ٸ ٶ ٷ ٵ

 !% ء

 ! ء ا ە ه ې ب ت پ ج چ خ ح د ر ز ژ س ش ع ف ق ك گ ڭ ل م ن ھ و ۇ ۋ ى ي ۆ









 A:А
 B:Б
 Ç:Ч
 D:Д
 E:Е
 Ä:Ә
 F:Ф
 G:Г
 H:Х
 I:И
 J:Җ
 Ž:Ж
 K:К
 L:Л
 M:М
 N:Н
 Ñ:Ң
 З:z
 Й:j
 O:О
 Ö:Ө
 P:П
 R:Р
 S:С
 Ş:Ш
 T:Т
 U:У
 Ü:Ү
 W:В
 Y:Ы
 Ý:Й
 Z:З

  a:а
  b:б
  ç:ч
  d:д
  e:е
  ä:ә
  f:ф
  g:г
  h:х
  i:и
  j:җ
  ž:ж
  k:к
  l:л
  m:м
  n:н
  ñ:ң
  з:z
  й:j
  o:о
  ö:ө
  p:п
  r:р
  s:с
  ş:ш
  t:т
  u:у
  ü:ү
  w:в
  y:ы
  ý:й
  z:з


 %{й%}:0
 %{й%}:j

 %{ˈ%}:0
 %{ˈ%}:ˈ

 ;


Sets

Vow = и ү е э ө а о у ы ;

!letter = ء ئ ا ە ب پ ت ج چ خ د ر ز ژ س ش غ ف ق ك گ ڭ ل م ن ھ و ۇ ۅ ۉ ۋ ى ي ;

backVow = а о ы у
          А О Ы У ;

Cons = б в г д ж з й к л м н п р с т ф х ц ч ш щ
       Б В Г Д Ж З Й К Л М Н П Р С Т Ф Х Ц Ч Ш Щ ;

frontConsCyr = к г
               К Г ;

Nasal = Н М Ң
        н м ң ;

!frontLetter = ك گ ە ۅ ۉ ;

frontSound = k ɡ ɣ ŋ e i ø y ;

!backLetter = ق ع ا و ۇ ;

backSound = q ʁ ɢ ɴ ɑ ɯ o u ;

Rules

"%{й%}:j after vowels except е"
%{й%}:j <=> [ Vow: - [ э: | е: ] ]/%{ˈ%}: _ ;

"к г ң in the context of back vowels"
Cx:Cy <=> backVow:/%{ˈ%}: _ ;
          _ backVow:/%{ˈ%}: ;
      except
          .#. а:/%{ˈ%}: _ (%{й%}:) е:/%{ˈ%}: ;  ! аке:ɑˈke
          .#. б:/%{ˈ%}: (%{й%}:) е:/%{ˈ%}: _ а:/%{ˈ%}: ;  ! Бегайым:beɣɑjɯm
          Nasal:/%{ˈ%}: _ ;
!          .#. _ (Cons:*/%{ˈ%}:*) Vow: ;
          ! keep in mind if modifying this rule:
          ! - байке:bɑjke
          ! - багелек:bɑɣelek
      where Cx in ( к г ң )
            Cy in ( q ʁ ɴ )
      matched ;

"г is a stop after nasals"
г:Cy <=> Vx: Cons:*/%{ˈ%}: Nasal:/%{ˈ%}: _ ;
!         .#. _ (Cons:*/%{ˈ%}:*) Vx: ;         ! грил
     where Vx in ( и ү е э ө а о у ы )
           Cy in ( ɡ ɡ ɡ ɡ ɡ ɢ ɢ ɢ ɢ )
     matched ;

"к and г in onset clusters (loanwords)"
Cx:Cy <=> .#. (%{ˈ%}:) _ Cons:/%{ˈ%}: ;
      where Cx in ( к г )
            Cy in ( k ɡ )
      matched ;

"stress on last syllable"
%{ˈ%}:ˈ <=>  _ Cons:/%{ˈ%}: Vow:/%{ˈ%}: (Vow:/%{ˈ%}:) Cons:*/%{ˈ%}: .#. ;
            .#. _ Cons:*/%{ˈ%}: Vow:/%{ˈ%}: (Vow:/%{ˈ%}:) Cons:/%{ˈ%}:* .#. ;
        except
            .#. Cons:/%{ˈ%}: Cons:*/%{ˈ%}: _ ;

"б as β"
б:β <=> Vow:/%{ˈ%}: _ Vow:/%{ˈ%}: ;

"dark ɫ"
л:ɫ <=> backVow:/%{ˈ%}: _ ;
        _ backVow:/%{ˈ%}: ;
    except
        :j (%{ˈ%}:) _ ;
        _ ь: ;

"second of long vowel as ː"
Vx:ː <=> Vy:/%{ˈ%}: _ ;
     where Vy in ( ү э ө а о у )
           Vx in ( ү э ө а о у )
     matched ;

"ж as ʒ only after д"
ж:ʒ <=> д:/%{ˈ%}: _ ;

! remaining issues:
!  - [x] грузин *ɢɾuˈzin / гладиатор *ɢɫɑdiɑtor / группа *ɢɾuppɑ
!  - [x] Чжин *ʧˈʤin / план *pˈɫɑn
!  - [x] джентльмен *dʤentlʲmen
!  - теңир *teɴiɾ
!  - stress before {E}, {B}{I}
!  - stress in Russian words
!  - бекем *—
!  - [x] поэзиянын *poːzijɑˈnɯn
!  - [x] поезд *poezd
